Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.120

Control of predatory birds—Expenditures and contracts.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of RCW 15.04.110 the director may make expenditures and contract for personal services, control materials and equipment as required to carry out such predatory bird control functions.

[ 1961 c 247 s 2.]